Maryland, session 2026, HB0268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–319.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DATA” MEANS STATISTICAL OR FACTUAL INFORMATION THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0268*

HOUSE BILL 268
(I) IS IN ALPHANUMERIC OR GEOSPATIAL FORM REFLECTED IN
A LIST, A TABLE, A GRAPH, A CHART, A MAP, OR ANY OTHER NONNARRATIVE FORMAT
THAT CAN BE DIGITALLY TRANSMITTED OR PROCESSED;
(II) IS REGULARLY CREATED OR MAINTAINED BY OR ON BEHALF
OF A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY; AND
(III) RECORDS A MEASUREMENT, TRANSACTION, OR
DETERMINATION OR PROVIDES INFORMATION ON GOVERNMENT SERVICES,
INITIATIVES, AND RESOURCES RELATED TO THE MISSION OF THE GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY.
(3) “DATA GOVERNANCE” MEANS THE AUTHORITY AND
DECISION–MAKING PARAMETERS ESTABLISHED FOR DATA MANAGEMENT,
LITERACY, AND USE THROUGHOUT ITS LIFE CYCLE TO ENSURE THAT THE STATE’S
DATA ASSETS ARE ACCURATE, CONSISTENT, SECURE, AND ACCESSIBLE WHILE
MANAGING PRIVACY AND CYBERSECURITY RISKS, INCLUDING CREATING POLICIES
AND PROCEDURES FOR DATA OWNERSHIP, ACCESS CONTROLS, SECURITY,
INTEGRITY, TRAINING, AND COMPLIANCE WITH INTERNAL AND EXTERNAL
REGULATIONS.
(4) “DATA LIFE CYCLE” MEANS THE FULL LIFE SPAN OF A DATA ASSET
FROM CREATION, COLLECTION, AND STORAGE THROUGH USE, SHARING,
ARCHIVING, AND DELETION, CONSISTENT WITH NIST–COMPLIANT STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE.
(5) “DATA LITERACY” MEANS THE ABILITY TO UNDERSTAND,
INTERPRET, CRITICALLY EVALUATE, AND EFFECTIVELY COMMUNICATE DATA TO
INFORM DECISIONS AND DRIVE ACTION.
(6) “DATA MANAGEMENT” MEANS PRACTICES, PROCESSES,
POLICIES, AND TOOLS USED TO COLLECT, STORE, ORGANIZE, SECURE, MAINTAIN,
AND UTILIZE DATA EFFECTIVELY THROUGHOUT ITS ENTIRE LIFE CYCLE.
(7) “DATA QUALITY” MEANS HOW WELL DATA MEETS DEFINED
STANDARDS, INCLUDING ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, CONSISTENCY, TIMELINESS,
VALIDITY, AND UNIQUENESS.
(8) “DATA READINESS” MEANS DATA’S FITNESS FOR USE WITH
EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES SUCH AS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND QUANTUM
COMPUTING.

HOUSE BILL 268 3
(9) “DATA SHARING” MEANS MAKING DATA ACCESSIBLE TO OTHER
USERS, SYSTEMS, OR ORGANIZATIONS UNDER PRINCIPLES OF SECURITY,
GOVERNANCE, AND PURPOSE.
(10) “DATA TRAINING” MEANS EDUCATING STATE EMPLOYEES ABOUT
HOW TO USE, MANAGE, AND INTERPRET DATA.
(11) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF ENTERPRISE DATA.
(B) (1) THERE IS A STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER SHALL BE APPOINTED AND
SUPERVISED BY THE SECRETARY.
(3) THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER
INCLUDE:
(I) ESTABLISHING, COORDINATING, AND IMPLEMENTING THE
STATEWIDE DATA STRATEGY AND POLICIES FOR UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT;
(II) ENSURING RESPONSIBLE GOVERNANCE, USE, AND
MANAGEMENT OF STATE DATA;
(III) PROVIDING ADVICE, RECOMMENDATIONS, AND
CONSULTATIONS TO THE SECRETARY AND ANY UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT
CONCERNING DATA POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND STANDARDS;
(IV) PUBLISHING AN ANNUAL STATE DATA STRATEGIC PLAN;
(V) DEVELOPING GUIDELINES FOR RESPONSIBLE AND
EQUITABLE USE OF DATA WITH CRITICAL AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES,
INCLUDING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND REQUIREMENTS FOR TRANSPARENCY,
RISK MANAGEMENT, DATA MINIMIZATION, AND BIAS MITIGATION; AND
(VI) AT LEAST QUARTERLY, CONVENING AN ENTERPRISE DATA
COUNCIL CONSISTING OF THE AGENCY DATA OFFICERS APPOINTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OR (F) OF THIS SECTION TO COORDINATE STATEWIDE DATA
GOVERNANCE STRUCTURES AND SHARE BEST PRACTICES.
(C) (1) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF ENTERPRISE DATA IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE HEAD OF THE OFFICE IS THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER.

HOUSE BILL 268
(3) THE OFFICE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(I) ESTABLISHING AND OVERSEEING STATEWIDE DATA
LITERACY AND GOVERNANCE PROGRAMS, INCLUDING STATEWIDE POLICIES,
FRAMEWORKS, AND STANDARDS FOR DATA MANAGEMENT, READINESS, AND
LITERACY, AND SHARING OF STATE DATA;
(II) COMPILING AN AUTHORITATIVE INVENTORY OF STATE
DATA;
(III) DEVELOPING STANDARDIZED MECHANISMS FOR
COORDINATION BETWEEN STATE AGENCIES, INCLUDING DATA STANDARDS,
INTEROPERABILITY GUIDELINES, AND INTERAGENCY DATA REQUEST WORKFLOWS;
(IV) ESTABLISHING PRIVACY–PRESERVING TECHNICAL
STANDARDS FOR METADATA MANAGEMENT AND DATA DE–IDENTIFICATION,
INCLUDING RISK–BASED AND RE–IDENTIFICATION PROTECTIONS; AND
(V) SUPPORTING AND OVERSEEING TRAINING REQUIREMENTS
FOR AGENCY DATA OFFICERS, INCLUDING ANNUAL CERTIFICATION AND
RECERTIFICATION.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE OFFICE WITH SUFFICIENT
STAFF TO PERFORM THE FUNCTIONS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) EACH PRINCIPAL DEPARTMENT LISTED IN § 8–201 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE SHALL APPOINT AN AGENCY DATA OFFICER.
(2) EACH AGENCY DATA OFFICER SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(I) COLLABORATING WITH THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER;
AND
(II) WITH RESPECT TO THEIR UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT:
1. DEVELOPING POLICIES THAT GOVERN THE USE,
MANAGEMENT, AND SHARING OF THE UNIT’S DATA;
2. OVERSEEING DATA QUALITY;
3. FACILITATING DATA SHARING;

HOUSE BILL 268 5
4. SUPPORTING DATA LITERACY AND TRAINING;
5. IMPLEMENTING DATA PRIVACY AND RISK
MANAGEMENT;
6. LIMITING PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
COLLECTION;
7. REPORTING DATA–RELATED ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING
COMPLIANCE WITH STATEWIDE DATA STRATEGY AND POLICIES;
8. MAKING REQUESTED DATA AVAILABLE TO THE STATE
CHIEF DATA OFFICER;
9. SUBMITTING AN ANNUAL INVENTORY OF DATA SETS
TO THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER AND IDENTIFYING WHICH DATA SETS ARE
PUBLISHABLE CONSISTENT WITH § 3.5–318 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
10. FILING AND UPDATING AN ANNUAL OPEN DATA PLAN
WITH THE OFFICE SPECIFYING PUBLICATION PRIORITIES, TIMELINES, FORMATS,
AND DATA QUALITY EXPECTATIONS CONSISTENT WITH STATEWIDE STANDARDS AND
THE TECHNICAL STANDARDS MANUAL;
11. SHARING INFORMATION WITH OTHER STATE
ENTITIES TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW TO IMPROVE SERVICES AND
REDUCE DUPLICATIVE COLLECTION, SUBJECT TO SECURITY, PRIVACY, AND
CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE; AND
12. PARTICIPATING IN THE COUNCIL ON OPEN DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–1503 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) EACH AGENCY DATA OFFICER SHALL COMPLY WITH DIRECTIONS
FROM THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER AS TO THE USE AND MANAGEMENT OF THE
UNIT’S DATA.
(F) A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT IS NOT A PRINCIPAL
DEPARTMENT LISTED IN § 8–201 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY:
(1) APPOINT AN AGENCY DATA OFFICER FOR THE PURPOSE OF
COLLABORATING WITH THE STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER ON THE DEVELOPMENT
OF POLICIES THAT GOVERN THE USE, MANAGEMENT, AND SHARING OF STATE DATA;
AND

HOUSE BILL 268
(2) DESIGNATE THE AGENCY DATA OFFICER AS A MEMBER OF THE
ENTERPRISE DATA COUNCIL CONVENED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.